Ha
Ha. interject. [ha, Latin.]

 An expression of wonder, surprise, sudden question, or sudden exertion.
You shall look fairer ere I give or hazard:What says the golden chest? ha! let me see. Shakesp.
Ha! what art thou! thou horrid headless trunk!It is my Hastings! Rowe's Jane Shore.
 An expression of laughter.
He saith among the trumpets ha, ha, and he smelleth the battle afar off. Job xxxix. 25.
Ha, ha, 'tis what so long I wish'd and vow'd;Our plots and delusionsHave wrought such confusions,That the monarch's a slave to the crowd. Dryd. Albion.

Haak
Haak. n.s. A fish. Ainsworth.

Habeas Corpus
Hábeas Corpus. [Latin.] A writ, the which, a man indicted of some trespass, being laid in prison for the same, may have out of the King's Bench, thereby to remove himself thither at this own costs, and to answer the cause there. Cowel.

Haberdasher
Haberdásher. n.s. [This word is ingeniously deduced by Minshew from habt ihr dass, German, have you this, the expression of a shopkeeper offering his wares to sale.] One who sells small wares; a pedlar.
Because these cunning men are like haberdashers of small wares, it is not amiss to set forth their shop. Bacon's Essays.
A haberdasher, who was the oracle of the coffeehouse, declared his opinion. Addison's Spectator, № 48.

Haberdine
Háberdine. n.s. A dried salt cod. Ainsworth.

Habergeon
Hábergeon. n.s. [haubergeon, French; halbergium, low Lat.] Armour to cover the neck and breast; breastplate; neckpiece; gorget.
And halbert some, and some a haberion;So every one in arms was quickly dight. Fairfax, b. i.
            The shot let fly, and grazingUpon his shoulder, in the passing,Lodg'd in Magnano's brass habergeon. Hudibras, p. i.

Habiliment
Habíliment. n.s. [habilement, French.] Dress; cloaths; garment.
            He the fairest Una found,Strange lady, in so strange habiliment,Teaching the satyres. Fairy Queen, b. i. cant. 6.
My riches are these poor habiliments,Of which if you should here disfurnish me,You take the sum and substance that I have. Shakespeare.
The clergy should content themselves with wearing gowns and other habiliments of Irish drapery. Swift.

Habilitate
To Habílitate. v.n. [habiliter, French.] To qualify; to entitle.
Divers persons in the house of commons were attainted, and thereby not legal, nor habilitate to serve in parliament, being disabled in the highest degree. Bacon's Henry VII.

Habilitation
Habilitátion. n.s. [from habilitate.] Qualification.
The things formerly spoken of, are but habilitations towards arms; and what is habilitation without intention and act? Bacon, Essay 30.

Hability
Hábility. n.s. [habilite, French.] Faculty; power.

Habit (noun)
Hábit. n.s. [habitus, Latin.]

 State of anything: as, habit of body.

 Dress; accoutrement.
                                      I shiftedInto a madman's rags, t' assume a semblanceThe very dogs disdain'd; and in this habitMet I my father. Shakespeare's King Lear.
If you have any justice, any pity;If ye be any thing, but churchmen's habits. Shakespeare.
Both the poets being dressed in the same English habit, story compared with story, judgment may be made betwixt them. Dryden's Fables, Preface.
The scenes are old, the habits are the sameWe wore last year. Dryden's Indian Emperor.
There are among the statues several of Venus, in different habits. Addison on Italy.
The clergy are the only set of men who wear a distinct habit from others. Swift.
 Habit is a power or ability in man of doing any thing, when it has been acquired by frequent doing the same thing. Locke.
He hath a better bad habit of frowning than the count Palatine. Shakesp. Merchant of Venice.
 Custom; inveterate use.
This is the last fatal step but one, which is, by frequent repetition of the sinful act, to continue and persist in it, 'till at length it settles into a fixed confirmed habit of sin; which being properly that which the apostle calls the finishing of sin, ends certainly in death; death not only as to merit, but also as to actual infliction. South's Sermons.
No civil broils have since his death arose,But faction now by habit does obey;And wars have that respect for his repose,As winds for halcyons when they breed at sea. Dryden.
The force of education is so great, that we may mould the minds and manners of the young into what shape we please, and give the impressions of such habits as shall ever afterwards remain. Atterbury's Sermons.

Habit (verb)
To Hábit. v.a. [from the noun.] To dress; to accoutre; to array.
    Present yourself and your fair princessBefore Leontes:She shall be habited as it becomesThe partner of your bed. Shakesp. Winter's Tale.
Having called to his memory Sir George Villiers, and the cloaths he used to wear, in which at that time he seemed to be habited, he thought him to be that person. Clarendon.
They habited themselves like those rural deities, and imitated them in their rustick dances. Dryden.

Habitable
Hábitable. adj. [habitable, Fr. habitabilis, Lat.] Capable of being dwelt in; capable of sustaining human creatures.
By means of our solitary situation, we know well most part of the habitable world, and are ourselves unknown. Bacon.
That was her torrid and inflaming time;This is her habitable tropique clime. Donne.
Look round the habitable world, how fewKnow their own good, or knowing it, pursue. Dryden.

Habitableness
Hábitableness. n.s. [from habitable.] Capacity of being dwelt in.
The cutting of the Equinoctial line decides that controversy of the habitableness of the Torrid zone. More.
Those ancient problems of the spherical roundness of the earth, the being of antipodes, and of the habitableness of the torrid zone, are abundantly demonstrated. Ray.

Habitance
Hábitance. n.s. [habitatio, Latin.] Dwelling; abode.
What art thou, man, if man at all thou art,That here in desart hast thine habitance?And these rich heaps of wealth do'st hide apartFrom the world's eye, and from her right usance. Fa. Qu.

Habitant
Hábitant. n.s. [habitant, Fr. habitans, Lat.] Dweller; one that lives in any place; inhabitant.
Not to earth are those bright luminariesOfficious; but to the earth's habitant:And for the heav'n's wide circuit, let it speakThe maker's high magnificence. Milton's Paradise Lost.
Pow'rs celestial to each other's viewStand still confest, though distant far they lie,Or habitants of earth, or sea, or sky. Pope's Odyssey.

Habitation
Habitátion. n.s. [habitation, French; habitatio, Latin.]

 The act of dwelling; the state of a place receiving dwellers.
        Amplitude almost immense, with starsNumerous, and ev'ry star perhaps a worldOf destin'd habitation. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. vii.
                            Palaces,For want of habitation and repair,Dissolve to heaps of ruins. Denham's Sophy.
Rocks and mountains, which in the first ages were high and craggy, and consequently then inconvenient for habitation, were by continual deterration brought to a lower pitch. Woodward's Natural History.
 Place of abode; dwelling.
Wisdom, to the end she might save many, built her house of that nature which is common unto all; she made not this or that man her habitation, but dwelt in us. Hooker, b. v.
                    God oft descends to visit menUnseen, and through their habitations walksTo mark their doings. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. xii.

Habitator
Habitátor. n.s. [Latin.] Dweller; inhabitant.
So is his presence more continued unto the northern inhabitants; and the longest day in Cancer is longer unto us than that in Capricorn unto the northern habitators. Brown.

Habitual
Habítual. adj. [habituel, from habit, French.] Customary; accustomed; inveterate; established by frequent repetition.
            Sin, there in pow'r beforeOnce actual; now in body, and to dwellHabitual habitant. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. x.
Art is properly an habitual knowledge of certain rules and maxims. South.
                By length of timeThe scurf is worn away of each committed crime:No speck is left of their habitual stains;But the pure ether of the soul remains. Dryden's Æn.
'Tis impossible to become an able artist, without making your art habitual to you. Dryden's Dufresnoy.

Habitually
Habítually. adv. [from habitual.] Customarily; by habit.
Internal graces and qualities of mind sanctify our natures, and render us habitually holy. Atterbury's Sermons.

Habituate
To Habítuate. v.a. [habituer, French.] To accustom; to use one's self by frequent repetition.
Men are first corrupted by bad counsel and company, and next they habituate themselves to their vicious practices. Tillot.
Such as live in a rarer air are habituated to the exercise of a greater muscular strength. Arbuthnot on Air.

Habitude
Hábitude. n.s. [habitudo, Latin; habitude, French.]

 Relation; respect; state with regard to something else.
We cannot conclude this complexion of nations from the vicinity or habitude they hold unto the sun. Brown's Vul. Err.
The will of God is like a streight unalterable rule; but the various comportments of the creature, either thwarting this rule, or holding conformity to it, occasions several habitudes of this rule into it. Hale's Origin of Mankind.
It results from the very nature and being of things, as they stand in such a certain habitude, or relation to one another. South's Sermons.
As by the objective part of perfect happiness we understand that which is best and last, and to which all other things are to be referred; so by the formal part must be understood the best and last habitude of man toward the best object. Norr.
In all the habitudes of lifeThe friend, the mistress, and the wife;Variety we still pursue. Swift.
 Familiarity; converse; frequent intercourse.
His knowledge in the noblest useful arts,Was such dead authors could not give;But habitudes with those who live. Dryden.
To write well, one must have frequent habitudes with the best company. Dryden.
 Long custom; habit; inveterate use.
Mankind is not more liable to deceit than willing to continue in a pleasing errour, strengthened by a long habitude. Dryden's Dufresnoy.
Thy ear, inur'd to charitable sounds,And pitying love, must feel the hateful woundsOf jest obscene, and vulgar ribaldry,The ill-bred question, and the loud reply,Brought by long habitude from bad to worse;Must hear the frequent oath, the direful curse. Prior.
 The power of doing any thing acquired by frequent repetition.
It is impossible to gain an exact habitude, without an infinite number of acts and perpetual practice. Dryd. Dufresnoy.

Habnab
Hábnab. adv. [hap ne hap, or nap; as would ne would, will ne will; that is, let it happen or not.] At random; at the mercy of chance; without any rule or certainty of effect.
        He circles draws and squares,With cyphers, astral characters;Then looks 'em o'er to understand 'em,Although set down habnab at random. Hudibras, p. ii.

Hack (verb active)
To Hack. v.a. [þaccan, Saxon; hacken, Dutch; hacher, Fr. from acase, an axe, Saxon.]

 To cut into small pieces; to chop; to cut slightly with frequent or unskilful blows.
He put on that armour, whereof there was no one piece wanting, though hacked in some places, bewraying some fight not long since passed. Sidney.
What a slave art thou, to hack thy sword as thou hast done, and say it was in fight! Shakespeare's Henry IV. p. i.
Richard the second here was hack'd to death. Shak. R. III.
I'll fight 'till from my bones my flesh be hackt. Shakesp.
One flourishing branch of his most royal rootIs hackt down, and his summer leaves all faded,By envy's hand, and murder's bloody axe. Shakes. Rich. II.
Burn me, hack me, hew me into pieces. Dryden.
But fate with butchers plac'd thy priestly stall,Meek modern faith to murder, hack and mawl. Pope.
Not the hack'd helmet, nor the dusty field,But purple vests and flow'ry garlands please. Addis. Ovid.
 To speak unreadily, or with hesitation.
Disarm them, and let them question; let them keep their limbs whole, and hack our English. Shakespeare.

Hack (verb neuter)
To Hack. v.n. To hackney; to turn hackney or prostitute. Hanmer.
I could be knighted. — What! thou liest. Sir Alice Ford, these knights will hack, and so thou shouldst alter the article of thy gentry. Shakesp. Merry Wives of Windsor.

Hackle (noun)
Háckle. n.s. Raw silk; any filmy substance unspun.
Take the hackle of a cock or capon's neck, or a plover's top: take off one side of the feather, and then take the hackle silk, gold or silver thread, and make these fast at the bent of the hook. Walton's Angler.

Hackle (verb)
To Háckle. v.a. [from hack.] To dress flax.

Hackney (noun)
Háckney. n.s. [hacnai, Welsh; hackeneye, Teuton. haquenée, French.]

 A pacing horse.

 A hired horse; hired horses being usually taught to pace, or recommended as good pacers.
Light and lewd persons were as easily suborned to make an affidavit for money, as post-horses and hackneys are taken to hire. Bacon's Off. of Alienation.
Who, mounted on a broom, the nagAnd hackney of a Lapland hag,In quest of you came hither post,Within an hour, I'm sure, at most. Hudibras, p. iii.
 A hireling; a prostitute.
            Three kingdoms rungWith his accumulative and hackney tongue. Roscommon.
That is no more than every loverDoes from his hackney lady suffer. Hudibras.
Shall each spurgall'd hackney of the day,Or each new pension'd sycophant, pretendTo break my windows. Pope, Dial. 2.
 Any thing let out for hire.
A wit can study in the streets;Not quite so well, however, as one mought;A hackney coach may chance to spoil a thought. Pope.
 Much used; common.
These notions young students in physick derive from their hackney authors. Harvey on Consumptions.

Hackney (verb)
To Háckney. v.a. [from the noun.] To practise in one thing; to accustom to the road.
He is long hackney'd in the ways of men. Shakespeare.

Hacqueton
Hácqueton. n.s. [haquet, old French, a little horse.] Some piece of armour.
You may see the very fashion of the Irish horseman in his long hose, riding shoes of costly cordwain, his hacqueton, and his habergeon. Spenser's State of Ireland.

Had
Had. The preterite and part. pass. of have.
I had rather be a country servant maid,Than a great queen with this condition,To be thus taunted. Shakespeare's Richard III.
Had we not better leave this Utica,To arm Numidia in our cause? Addison's Cato.

Haddock
Háddock. n.s. [hadot, French.] A sea-fish of the cod kind, but small.
The coast is plentifully stored with pilchards, herrings, and haddocks. Carew's Survey of Cornwal.

Haft (noun)
Haft. n.s. [hæft, Saxon; heft, Dutch, from To have or hold.] A handle; that part of any instrument that is taken into the hand.
             This brandish'd dagger I'll bury to the haft in her fair breast. Dryd. and Lee's Oedip.
 These extremities of the joints are the hafts and handles of the members. Dryden's Dufresnoy.
 A needle is a simple body, being only made of steel; but a sword is a compound, because its haft or handle is made of materials different from the blade. Watts's Logick.

Haggle (verb neuter)
To Hággle. v.n. To be tedious in a bargain; to be long in coming to the price.

Hagiographer
Hágiographer. n.s. [ἅγιος and γράφω.] A holy writer. The Jews divide the Holy Scriptures of the Old Testament into the law, the prophets, and the hagiographers.

Hah
Hah. interject. An expression of sudden effort.
 Her coats tuck'd up, and all her motions just, She stamps, and then cries hah! at ev'ry thrust. Dryden.

Hair
Hair. n.s.  [hær, Saxon.]

 One of the common teguments of the body. It is to be found upon all the parts of the body, except the soles of the feet and palms of the hands. When we examine the hairs with a microscope, we find that they have each a round, bulbous root, which lies pretty deep in the skin, and which draws their nourishment from the surrounding humours: that each hair consists of five or six others, wrapt up in a common tegument or tube. They grow as the nails do, each part near the root thrusting forward that which is immediately above it, and not by any liquor running along the hair in tubes, as plants grow. Quincy.
 A single hair.
 My fleece of woolly hair uncurls. Shakesp. Tit. Andr.
 Shall the difference of hair only, on the skin, be a mark of a different internal constitution between a changeling and a drill? Locke.
                 Naughty lady, These hairs which thou do'st ravish from my chin, Will quicken and accuse thee. Shakesp. King Lear.
             Much is breeding; Which, like the courser's hair, hath yet but life, And not a serpent's poison. Shakesp. Ant. and Cleopatra.
 Any thing proverbially small.
             If thou tak'st more Or less than just a pound; if the scale turn But in the estimation of a hair, Thou diest. Shakespeare's Merchant of Venice.
 He judges to a hair of little indecencies, and knows better than any man what is not to be written. Dryden.
 Course; order; grain; the hair falling in a certain direction.
 Mr. doctor, he is a curer of souls, and you a curer of bodies: if you should fight, you go against the hair of your profession. Shakespeare's Merry Wives of Windsor.

Hairbel
Haírbel. n.s. The name of a flower; the hyacinth.

Hairbrained
Háirbrained. adj. [This should rather be written harebrained, unconstant, unsettled, wild as a hare.] Wild; irregular; unsteady.
Let's leave this town; for they are hairbrained slaves, And hunger will enforce them be more eager. Shakes. H.VI.

Hairbreadth
Háirbreadth. n.s. [hair and breadth.] A very small distance; the diameter of a hair.
 Seven hundred chosen men left-handed could sling stones at an hairbreadth, and not miss. Judg. xx. 16.
 I spoke of most disastrous chances, Of moving accidents by flood and field; Of hairbreadth 'scapes in th' imminent deadly breach. Shak.

Haircloth
Háircloth. n.s. [hair and cloth.] Stuff made of hair, very rough and prickly, worn sometimes in mortification.
It is composed of reeds and parts of plants woven together, like a piece of haircloth. Grew's Musæum.

Hairiness
Háiriness. n.s. [from hairy.] The state of being covered with hair, or abounding with hair.

Hairlace
Hairláce. n.s. [hair and lace] The fillet with which women tie up their hair.
 Worms are commonly resembled to a woman's hairlace or fillet, thence called tenia. Harvey on Consumptions.
 If Molly happens to be careless, And but neglects to warm her hairlace, She gets a cold as sure as death. Swift.

Hairless
Háirless. adj. [from hair.] Without hair.
White beards have arm'd their thin and hairless scalps Against thy majesty. Shakespeare's Richard II.

Hairy
Háiry. adj. [from hair.]

 Overgrown with hair; covered with hair.
 She his hairy temples then had rounded With coronet of flowers. Shakes. Midsum. Night's Dream.
 Children are not hairy, for that their skins are more perspirable. Bacon's Natural History.
 Consisting of hair.
                Storms have shed From vines the hairy honours of their head. Dryd. Virgil.

Hake
Hake. n.s. A kind of fish.
The coast is plentifully stored with mackrel and hake. Carew's Survey of Cornwal.

Hakot
Hákot. n.s. [from hake.] A kind of fish. Ainsworth.

Hal


Halberd


Hale (verb)
To Hale. v.a. [halen, Dutch; haler, French.] To drag by force; to pull violently.
                      Fly to your house;The plebians have got your fellow tribune,And hale him up and down. Shakesp. Coriolanus.
                    My third comfort,Starr'd most unluckily, is from my breastHal'd out to murder. Shakespeare's Winter's Tale.
Give diligence that thou mayest be delivered from him, lest he hale thee to the judge. Lu. xii. 58.
He by the neck hath hal'd, in pieces cut,And set me as a mark on every butt. Sandys.
Thither by harpy-footed furies hal'd,At certain revolutions, all the damn'dAre brought. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. ii.
This sinistrous gravity is drawn that way by the great artery, which then subsideth, and haleth the heart unto it. Brown.
Who would not be disgusted with any recreation, in itself indifferent, if he should with blows be haled to it when he had no mind? Locke.
In all the tumults at Rome, though the people proceeded sometimes to pull and hale one another about, yet no blood was drawn 'till the time of the Gracchi. Swift.

Half-scholar
Half-scholar. n.s. Imperfectly learned.
 We have many half-scholars now-a-days, and there is much confusion and inconsistency in the notions and opinions of some persons. Watts's Improvement of the Mind.

Hallelujah
Hallelújah. n.s. [.הללויה] Praise ye the Lord. A song of thanksgiving.
                    Then shall thy saints Unfained hallelujahs to Thee sing, Hymns of high praise. Milton's Paradise Lost b. vi.
 Singing those devout hymns and heavenly anthems, in which the church militant seems ambitious to emulate the triumphant, and echo back the solemn praises and hallelujahs of the celestial choirs. Boyle.

Halloo (interjection)
Hálloo. interj. [The original of this word is controverted: some imagine it corrupted from a lui, to him! others from allons, let us go! and Skinner from haller, to draw.] A word of encouragement when dogs are let loose on their game.
             Some popular chief, More noisy than the rest, but cries halloo, And, in a trice, the bellowing herd come out. Dryden.

Halloo (verb neuter)
To Hálloo. v.n. [haler, Fr.] To cry as after the dogs.
 A number of country folks hallooed and houted after me, as at the arrantest coward that ever shewed his shoulders to his enemy. Sidney, b. ii.
            A cry more tuneable Was never halloo'd to, nor cheer'd with horn. Shakespeare.

Hand (noun)
Hand. n.s. [hand, hond, Saxon, and in all the Teutonick dialects.]

 The palm with the fingers; the member with which we hold or use any instrument.
They laid hands upon him, and bound him hand and foot. Knolles's History of the Turks.
So hand in hand they pass'd, the loveliest pairThat ever since in love's embraces met. Milt. Parad. Lost.
They hand in hand, with wandering steps and slow,Through Eden took their solitary way. Milton.
That wonderful instrument the hand, was it made to be idle? Berkley.
 Measure of four inches; a measure used in the matches of horses; a palm.

 Side, right or left.
For the other side of the court-gate on this hand, and that hand, were hangings of fifteen cubits. Ex. xxxviii. 15.
 Part; quarter; side.
It is allowed on all hands, that the people of England are more corrupt in their morals than any other nation this day under the sun. Swift.
 Ready payment with respect to the receiver.
Of which offer the bassa accepted, receiving in hand one year's tribute. Knolles's History of the Turks.
 These two must make our duty very easy; a considerable reward in hand, and the assurance of a far greater recompence hereafter. Tillotson's Sermons.
 Ready payment with regard to the payer.
Let not the wages of any man tarry with thee, but give it him out of hand. Tob. iv. 14.
 Rate; price.
Time is the measure of business, as money of wares: business is bought at a dear hand, where there is small dispatch. Bacon, Essay 26.
 Terms; conditions.
With simplicity admire and accept the mystery; but at no hand by pride, ignorance, interest, or vanity wrest it to ignoble senses. Taylor's Worthy Communicant.
It is either an ill sign or an ill effect, and therefore at no hand consistent with humility. Taylor's Rule of living holy.
 Act; deed; external action.
Thou sawest the contradiction between my heart and hand. King Charles.
 Labour; act of the hand.
Alnaschar was a very idle fellow, that never would set his hand to and business during his father's life. Addison's Spectat.
I rather suspect my own judgement than I can believe a fault to be in that poem, which lay so long under Virgil's correction, and had his last hand put to it. Addison.
 Performance.
             Where are these porters,These lazy knaves?  Y'ave made a fine hand! fellows,There's a trim rabble let in. Shakespeare's Henry VIII.
 Power of performance.
Will. Honeycomb has told me, that he had a great mind to try his hand at a Spectator, and that he would fain have one of his writing in my works. Addison's Spectator.
A friend of mine has a very fine hand on the violin. Addison's Guardian, №. 98.
 Attempt; undertaking.
Out of them you dare take in hand to lay open the original of such a nation. Spenser on Ireland.
 Manner of gathering or taking.
As her majesty hath received great profit, so may she, by a moderate hand, from time to time reap the like. Bacon
 Workmanship; power or act of manufacturing or making.
An intelligent being, coming out of the hands of infinite perfection, with an aversion or even indifferency to be reunited with its Author, the source of its utmost felicity, is such a shock and deformity in the beautiful analogy of things, as is not consistent with finite wisdom and perfection. Cheyne.
 Manner of acting or performing.
The master saw the madness rise;His glowing cheeks, his ardent eyes;And while he heav'n and earth defy'd,Chang'd his hand, and check'd his pride. Dryden.
 Agency; part in action.
God must have set a more than ordinary esteem upon that which David was not thought fit to have an hand in. South.
 The act of giving or presenting.
Let Tamar dress the meat in my sight, that I may eat it at her hand. 2 Sa. xiii. 5.
To-night the poet's advocate I stand,And he deserves the favour at my hand. Addison.
 Act of receiving any thing ready to one's hand, when it only waits to be taken.
His power reaches no farther than to compound and divide the materials that are made to his hand; but can do nothing towards the making or destroying one atom of what is already in being. Locke.
Many, whose greatness and fortune were not made to their hands, had sufficient qualifications and opportunities of rising to these high posts. Addison's Freeholder.
 Care; necessity of managing.
Jupiter had a farm a long time upon his hands, for want of a tenant to come up to his price. L'Estrange.
         When a statesman wants a day's defence,Or envy holds a whole week's war with sense,Or simple pride for flatt'ry makes demands,May dunce by dunce be whistled off my hands. Pope.
 Discharge of duty.
Let it therefore be required, on both parts, at the hands of the clergy, to be in meanness of estate like the apostles; at the hands of the laity, to be as they who lived under the apostles. Hooker, Preface.
 Reach; nearness: as, at hand, within reach, near, approaching.
Your husband is at hand, I hear his trumpet. Shakesp
Cousins, I hope the days are near at handThat chambers will be safe. Shakespeare's Macbeth.
He is at hand, and Pindarus is comeTo do you salutation. Shakespeare's Julius Caesar.
The sight of his mind was like some sights of eyes; rather strong at hand than to carry afar off. Bacon's Henry VII.
Any light thing that moveth, when we find no wind, sheweth a wind at hand. Bacon's Natural History.
A very great sound near hand hath strucken many deaf. Bacon's Natural History, №. 128.
It is not probable that any body should effect that at a distance, which, nearer hand, it cannot perform. Brown.
When mineral or metal is to be generated, nature needs not to have at hand salt, sulphur, and mercury. Boyle.
 Manual management.
Nor swords at hand, nor hissing darts afar,Are doom'd t' avenge the tedious bloody war. Dryd. Juven.
 State of being in preparation.
Where is our usual manager mirth?What revels are in hand? Is there no play,To ease the anguish of a torturing hour? Shakespeare.
 State of being in present agitation.
I look'd upon her with a soldier's eye;That lik'd, but had a rougher task in handThan to drive liking to the name of war. Shakespeare.
It is indifferent to the matter in hand which way the learned shall determine of it. Locke.
 Cards held at game.
There was never an hand drawn, that did double the rest of the habitable world, before this; for so a man may term it, if he shall put to account that which may be hereafter, by the occupation and colonizing of those countries. Bacon.
 That which is used in opposition to another.
                 He would dispute,Confute, change hands, and still confute. Hudibras, p. i.
 Scheme of action.
 Consult of your own ways, and think which handIs best to take. Ben. Johnson's Catiline.
They who thought they could never be secure, except the king were first at their mercy, were willing to change the hand in carrying on the war. Clarendon, b. viii.
 Advantage; gain; superiority.
The French king, supposing to make his hand by those rude ravages in England, broke off his treaty of peace, and proclaimed hostility. Hayward.
 Competition; contest.
She in beauty, education, blood,
Holds hand with any princess of the world. Shakes. K. Lear.
 Transmission; conveyance; agency of conveyance.
The salutation by the hand of me Paul. Col. iv. 18.
 Possession; power.
Sacraments serve as the moral instruments of God to that purpose; the use whereof is in our hands, the effect in his. Hooker.
And though you war, like petty wrangling states,You're in my hand; and when I bid you cease,You shall be crush'd together into peace. Dryden
Between the landlord and tenant there must be a quarter of the revenue of the land constantly in their hands. Locke.
It is fruitless pains to learn a language, which one may guess by his temper he will wholly neglect, as soon as an approach to manhood, setting him free from a governour, shall put him into the hands of his own inclination. Locke.
Vectigales Agri were lands taken from the enemy, and distributed amongst the soldiers, or left in the hands of the proprietors under the condition of certain duties. Arbuthnot.
 Pressure of the bridle.
There are no tricks in plain and simple faith;But hollow men, like horses hot at hand,Make gallant show and promise of their mettle. Shakesp.
 Method of government; discipline; restraint.
Menelaus bare an heavy hand over the citizens, having a malicious mind against his countrymen. 2 Mac. v. 23.
He kept a strict hand on his nobility, and chose rather to advance clergymen and lawyers. Bacon's Henry VII.
However strict a hand is to be kept upon all desires of fancy, yet in recreation fancy must be permitted to speak. Locke.
 Influence; management.
         Flattery, the dang'rous nurse of vice,Got hand upon his youth, to pleasures bent. Daniel
 That which performs the office of a hand in pointing.
The body, though it moves, yet changing perceivable distance with other bodies, as fast as the ideas of our own minds do naturally follow one another, the thing seems to stand still; as is evident in the hands of clocks and shadows of sundials. Locke.
 Agent; person employed.
The wisest prince, if he can save himself and his people from ruin, under the worst administration, what may not his subjects hope for when he changeth hands, and maketh use of the best? Swift.
 Giver, and receiver.
This tradition is more like to be a notion bred in the mind of man, than transmitted from hand to hand through all generations. Tillotson, Sermon 1.
 An actor; a workman; a soldier.
Your wrongs are known: impose but your commands,This hour shall bring you twenty thousand hands. Dryden.
Demetrius appointed the painter guards for his security, pleased that he could preserve that hand from the barbarity and insolence of soldiers. Dryden's Dufresnoy.
A dictionary containing a natural history requires too many hands, as well as too much time, ever to be hoped for. Locke.
 Catch or reach without choice.
The men of Israel smote as well the men of every city as the beast, and all that came to hand. Judg. xx. 48.
A sweaty reaper from his tillage broughtFirst fruits, the green ear, and the yellow sheaf,Uncull'd as came to hand. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. xi.
 Form or craft of writing.
Here is th' indictment of the good lord Hastings,Which in a set hand fairly is engross'd;Eleven hours I've spent to write it over. Shakesp. Rich. III.
Solyman shewed him his own letters intercepted, asking him if he knew not that hand, if he knew not that seal. Knoll.
Being discovered by their knowledge of Mr. Cowley's hand, I happily escaped. Denham, Dedication.
If my debtors do not keep their day,Deny their hands, and then refuse to pay,I must attend. Dryd Juvenal.
Whether men write court or Roman hand, or any other, there is something peculiar in every one's writing. Cockburn
The way to teach to write, is to get a plate graved with the characters of such hand you like. Locke
Constantia saw that the hand writing agreed with the contents of the letter. Addison's Spectator.
I present these thoughts in an ill hand; but scholars are bad penmen: we seldom regard the mechanick part of writing. Felton on the Classicks.
They were wrote on both sides, and in a small hand. Arbut.
 Hand over head. Negligently; rashly; without seeing what one does.
So many strokes of the alarum bell of fear and awaking to other nations, and the facility of the titles, which, hand over hand, have served their turn, doth ring the peal so much the louder. Bacon's War with Spain.
A country fellow got an unlucky tumble from a tree: thus 'tis, says a passenger, when people will be doing things hand over head, without either fear or wit. L'Estrange.
 Hand to Hand. Close fight.
In single opposition, hand to hand,He did confound the best part of an hour. Shakesp. H. IV.
He issues, ere the fight, his dread command,That slings afar, and poiniards hand to hand,Be banish'd from the field. Dryden's Fables.
 Hand in Hand.  In union; conjointly.
Had the sea been Marlborough's element, the war had been bestowed there, to the advantage of the country, which would then have gone hand in hand with his own. Swift
 Hand in Hand.  Fit; pat.
As fair and as good, a kind of hand in hand comparison, had been something too fair and too good for any lady in Britany. Shakespeare's Cymbeline.
 Hand to mouth.  As want requires.
I can get bread from hand to mouth, and make even at the year's end. L'Estrange.
 To bear in Hand. To keep in expectation; to elude.
A rascally yea forsooth knave, to bear in hand, and then stand upon security. Shakespeare's Henry IV. p. ii.
 To be Hand and Glove. To be intimate and familiar.

Handsome (adjective)
Hándsome. adj. [handsaem, Dutch, ready, dexterous.]

 Ready; gainly; convenient.
 For a thief it is so handsome, as it may seem it was first invented for him. Spenser.
 Beautiful with dignity; graceful.
 A great man entered by force into a peasant's house, and, finding his wife very handsome, turned the good man out of his dwelling. Addison's Guardian.
 Elegant; graceful.
 That easiness and handsome address in writing, which is hardest to be attained by persons bred in a meaner way, will be familiar to you. Felton on the Classicks.
 Ample; liberal: as, a handsome fortune.

 Generous; noble: as, a handsome action.

Handsome (verb)
To Hándsome. v.a. [from the adjective.] To render elegant or neat.
                     Him all reputeFor his device in handsoming a suit;To judge of lace he hath the best conceit. Donne.

Handsomely
Hándsomely. adv. [from handsome.]

 Conveniently; dexterously.
Under it he may cleanly convey any fit pillage that cometh handsomely in his way. Spenser on Ireland.
Where the kind nymph, changing her faultless shape,Becomes unhandsome, handsomely to 'scape. Waller.
 Beautifully; gracefully.

 Elegantly; neatly.
A carpenter, after he hath sawn down a tree, hath wrought it handsomely, and made a vessel thereof. Wisd. xiii. 11.
 Liberally; generously.
I am finding out a convenient place for an alms-house, which I intend to endow very handsomely for a dozen super-annuated husbandmen. Addison.

Handsomeness
Hándsomeness. n.s. [from handsome.] Beauty; grace; elegance.
Accompanying her mourning garments with a doleful countenance, yet neither forgetting handsomeness in her mourning garments, nor sweetness in her doleful countenance. Sidney.
For handsomeness sake, it were good you hang the upper glass upon a nail. Bacon's Natural History,
In cloths, cheap handsomeness doth bear the bell. Herbert.
Persons of the fairer sex like that handsomeness for which they find themselves to be the most liked. Boyle.

Handvice
Hándvice. n.s. [hand and vice.] A vice to hold small work in. Moxon's Mech. Exer.

Handwriting


Handy


Handydandy
Hándydandy. n.s. A play in which children change hands and places.
 See how yond justice rails upon yond simple thief! Hark in thine ear: change places, and, handydandy, which is the justice, which is the thief. Shakespeare's King Lear.
 Neither cross and pile, nor ducks and drakes, are quite so ancient as handydandy. Arbuthn. and Pope's Mart. Scrib.

Hang (verb active)


Hang (verb neuter)


Hap
Hap. n.s. [anhap, in Welsh, is misfortune.]

 Chance; fortune.
Things casual do vary, and that which a man doth but chance to think well of cannot still have the like hap. Hooker.
Whether art it were, or heedless hap,As through the flow'ring forest rash she fled,In her rude hairs sweet flowers themselves did lap,And flourishing fresh leaves and blossoms did enwrap. F. Q.
A fox had the hap to fall into the walk of a lion. L'Estr.
 That which happens by chance or fortune.
Curst be good haps, and curst be they that buildTheir hopes on haps, and do not make despairFor all these certain blows the surest shield. Sidney.
To have ejected whatsoever that church doth make account of, without any other crime than that it hath been the hap thereof to be used by the church of Rome, and not to be commanded in the word of God, might haply have pleased some few men, who, having begun such a course themselves, must be glad to see their example followed. Hooker, b. iv.
 Accident; casual event; misfortune.
Solyman commended them for their valour in their evil haps, more than the victory of others got by good fortune. Knolles.
Nor feared she among the bands to strayOf armed men; for often had she seenThe tragick end of many a bloody fray:Her life had full of haps and hazards been. Fairfax, b. vi.

Happiness
Háppiness. n.s. [from happy.]

 Felicity; state in which the desires are satisfied.
Happiness is that estate whereby we attain, so far as possibly may be attained, the full possession of that which simply for itself is to be desired, and containeth in it after an eminent sort the contentation of our desires, the highest degree of all our perfection. Hooker, b. i.
 Oh! happiness of sweet retir'd content, To be at once secure and innocent. Denham.
 The various and contrary choices that men make in the world, argue that the same thing is not good to every man alike: this variety of pursuits shews, that every one does not place his happiness in the same thing. Locke.
 Good luck; good fortune.

 Fortuitous elegance; unstudied grace.
 Certain graces and happinesses, peculiar to every language, give life and energy to the words. Denham.
 Some beauties yet no precepts can declare;For there's a happiness as well as care. Pope on Criticism.

Happy
Háppy. adj. [from hap; as lucky for luck.]

 In a state of felicity; in a state where the desire is satisfied.
At other end Uran did Strephon lendHer happy making hand. Sidney.
              Am I happy in thy news?— If to have done the thing you gave in chargeBeget you happiness, be happy then;For it is done. Shakespeare's Richard III.
Truth and peace, and love, shall ever shineAbout the supreme throneOf him, t' whose happy making sight alone,When once our heav'nly guided soul shall climb. Milton.
Though the presence of imaginary good cannot make us happy, the absence of it may make us miserable. Addison.
 Lucky; successful; fortunate.
Chymists have been more happy in finding experiments than the causes of them. Boyle.
Yet in this agony his fancy wrought,And fear supply'd him with this happy thought. Dryden.
 Addressful; ready.
One gentleman is happy at a reply, and another excels in a rejoinder. Swift.

Harass (noun)
Hárass. n.s. [from the verb.] Waste; disturbance.
            The men of Judah, to preventThe harass of their land, beset me round. Milton's Agonist.

Harass (verb)
To Ha'rass. v.a. [harasser, French, from harasse, a heavy buckler, according to Du Cauge.] To weary; to fatigue; to tire with labour and uneasiness.
These troops came to the army but the day before, harassed with a long and wearisome march. Bacon's War with Spain.
Our walls are thinly mann'd, our best men slain;The rest, an heartless number, spent with watching,And harass'd out with duty. Dryden's Spanish Fryar.
Nature oppress'd, and harass'd out with care,Sinks down to rest. Addison's Cato.

Hare (noun)
Hare. n.s. [hara, Saxon; karh, Erse.]

 A small quadruped, with long ears and short tail, that moves by leaps, remarkable for timidity, vigilance, and fecundity; the common game of hunters.
             Dismay'd not this Our captains Macbeth and Banquo? —— Yes, As sparrows, eagles; or the hare, the lion. Shakesp. Macb.
 We view in the open champaign a brace of swift greyhounds coursing a good stout and well breathed hare. More.
 Your dressings must be with Galen's powder and hare's fur. Wiseman's Surgery.
 Poor is the triumph o'er the timid hare. Thoms. Autumn.
 A constellation.
 The hare appears, whose active rays supply A nimble force, and hardly wings deny. Creech.

Hare (verb)
To Hare. v.n. [harier, French.] To fright; to hurry with terrour.
To hare and rate them, is not to teach but vex them. Locke.

Harebrained
Hárebrained. adj. [from hare the verb and brain.] Volatile; unsettled; wild; fluttering; hurried.
 That harebrained wild fellow begins to play the fool, when others are weary of it. Bacon's Henry VII.

Have
To Have. v.a. pret. and part. pass. had. [haben, Gothick; habban, Saxon; hebben, Dutch; avoir, French; avere, Ital.]

 Not to be without.
I have brought him before you, that after examination had I might have something to write. Acts xxv. 26.
 To carry; to wear.
Upon the mast they saw a young man, who sat as on horseback, having nothing upon him. Sidney.
 To make use of.
I have no Levite to my priest. Judg. xvii. 13.
 To possess.
He that gathered much had nothing over, and he that gathered little had no lack. Ex. xvi. 18.
 To bear; to carry; to be attended with or united to, as an accident or concomitant.
I will never trust a man again for keeping his sword clean; nor believe he can have every thing in him, by wearing his apparel neatly. Shakespeare's All's well that ends well.
 To obtain; to enjoy.
Now, O Father, glorify me with thine own self, with the glory which I had with thee before the world was. Jo. xvii. 5.
 To take; to receive;
A secret happiness, in Petronius, is called curiosa felicitas, and which I suppose he had from the feliciter audere of Horace. Dryden.
 To be in any state.
Have I need of madmen, that ye have brought this fellow? 1 Sa. xxi. 15.
 To put; to take.
With tossing and raking, and setting on cox,Grass lately in swathes is meat for an oxe;That done, go and cart it, and have it away. Tuss. Husb.
 To procure; to find.
I would fain have any one name to me that tongue, that any one can speak as he should do, by the rules of grammar. Locke on Education.
 Not to neglect; not to omit.
I cannot speak; if my heart be not ready to burst: Well, sweet Jack, have a care of thyself. Shakespeare's Henry IV.
Your plea is good; but still I say beware:Laws are explain'd by men, so have a care. Pope.
 To hold; to regard.
Of the maid servants shall I be had in honour. 2 Sa. vi. 22.
The proud have had me greatly in derision. Ps. cxix. 51.
 To maintain; to hold opinion.
Sometimes they will have them to be natural heat, whereas some of them are crude and cold; and sometimes they will have them to be the qualities of the tangible parts, whereas they are things by themselves. Bacon's Natural History.
 To contain.
You have of these pedlars that have more in 'em than you'd think, sister. Shakespeare's Winter's Tale.
 To require; to claim.
What would these madmen have?First they would bribe us without pence,Deceive us without common sense,And without pow'r enslave. Dryden.
 To be a husband or wife to another.
If I had been married to him, for all he was in woman's apparel, I would not have had him. Shakespeare.
 To be engaged, as in a task.
If we maintain things that are established, we have to strive with a number of heavy prejudices, deeply rooted in the hearts of men. Hooker, b. i. s. 1.
The Spaniards captain never hath to meddle with his soldiers pay. Spenser on Ireland.
You did set your course to treat of the evils which hindered the peace and good ordering of that land, among which that of the inconvenience of the laws was the first which you had in hand. Spenser on Ireland.
Kings have to deal with their neighbours, their wives, their children, their prelates or clergy, their nobles, their merchants and their commons. Bacon's Essays.
 To wish; to desire.
I had rather be a door-keeper in the house of my God, than to dwell in the tents of wickedness. Ps. lxxxiv. 10.
I would have no man discouraged with that kind of life or series of actions, in which the choices of others, or his own necessities, may have engaged him. Addison.
 To buy.
If these trifles were rated only by art and artfulness, we should have them much cheaper. Collier on human Reason.
 It is most used in English, as in other European languages, as an auxiliary verb to make the tenses.  Have the preter-perfect, and had the preterpluperfect.
If there had been words enow between them to have expressed provocation, they had gone together by the ears. Cong.
I have heard one of the greatest genius's this age has produced, who had been trained up in all the polite studies of antiquity, assure me, upon his being obliged to search into records, that he at last took an incredible pleasure in it. Addison.
I have not here considered custom as it makes things easy, but as it renders them delightful; and though others have made the same reflections, it is impossible they may not have drawn those uses from it. Addison.
That admirable precept which Pythagoras is said to have given to his disciples, and which that philosopher must have drawn from the observation I have enlarged upon. Addison.
The gods have placed labour before virtue. Addison.
This observation we have made on man. Addison.
Evil spirits have contracted in the body habits of lust and sensuality, malice and revenge. Addison.
These torments have already taken root in them. Addison.
It has been finely improved by many divines. Addison.
That excellent author has shewn how every particular custom and habit of virtue will, in its own nature, produce the heaven, or a state of happiness, in him who shall hereafter practise it. Addison.
 Have at, or with, is an expression denoting resolution to make some attempt.
He that will caper with me for a thousand marks, let him lend me the money, and have at him. Shak. Henry IV. p. ii.
I can bear my part; 'tis my occupation: have at it with you. Shakespeare's Winter's Tale.
I never was out at a mad frolick, though this is the maddest I ever undertook: have with you, lady mine; I take you at your word. Dryden's Spanish Fryar.

Head (noun)
Head. n.s. [heafod, heafd, Saxon; hoofd, Dutch; heved, old English, whence by contraction head.]

 The part of the animal that contains the brain or the organ of sensation or thought.
Vein healing verven, and head purging dill. Spenser.
                Over head up-grewInsuperable height of loftiest shade. Milton's Parad. Lost.
My head geers off, what filthy work you make. Dryden.
The dewy paths of meadows we will tread,For crowns and chaplets to adorn thy head. Dryden.
I could still have offers, that some, who hold their heads higher, would be glad to accept. Swift.
 Person as exposed to any danger or penalty.
What he gets more of her than sharp words, let it lie on my head. Shakespeare's Merry Wives of Windsor.
Who of all ages to succeed, but feelingThe evil on him brought by me, will curseMy head? ill fare our ancestor impure. Milt. Parad. Lost.
 Head and Ears. The whole person.
In jingling rhimes well fortify'd and strong,He fights intrench'd o'er head and ears in song. Granville.
 Denomination of any animals.
When Innocent XI. desired the marquis of Carpio to furnish thirty thousand head of swine, he could not spare them; but thirty thousand lawyers he had at his service. Addison.
The tax upon pasturage was raised according to a certain rate per head upon cattle. Arbuthnot on Coins.
 Chief; principle person; one to whom the rest are subordinate; leader; commander.
For their commons, there is little danger from them, except it be where they have great and potent heads. Bacon.
        Your head I him appoint;And by myself have sworn, to him shall bowAll knees in heav'n, and shall confess him lord. Milton.
The heads of the chief sects of philosophy, as Thales, Anaxagoras, and Pythagoras, did likewise consent to this tradition. Tillotson's Sermons.
 Place of honour; the first place.
Notwithstanding all the justices had taken their place upon the bench, they made room for the old knight at the head of them. Addison's Spectator.
 Place of command.
An army of fourscore thousand troops, with the duke of Marlborough at the head of them, could do nothing against an enemy. Addison on the War.
 Countenance; presence.
Richard not far from hence hath hid his head. Sh. R. II.
With Cain go wander through the shade of night,And never shew thy head by day or light. Shak. Rich. II.
Ere to-morrow's sun shall shew his head. Dryden.
 Understanding; faculties of the mind.
The wenches laid their heads together. L'Estrange.
A fox and a goat went down a well to drink: the goat fell to hunting which way to get back; oh, says Reynard, never trouble your head, but leave that to me. L'Estrange.
Work with all the ease and speed you can, without breaking your head, and being so very industrious in starting scruples. Dryden's Dufresnoy.
The lazy and inconsiderate took up their notions by chance, without much beating their heads about them. Locke.
If a man shews that he has no religion, why should we think that he beats his head and troubles himself to examine the grounds of this or that doctrine. Locke.
When in ordinary discourse we say a man has a fine head, we express ourselves metaphorically, and speak in relation to his understanding; and when we say of a woman she has a fine head, we speak only in relation to her commode. Addison.
We laid our heads together, to consider what grievances the nation had suffered under king George. Addis. Freeholder.
 Face; front; fore part.
        The gathering crowd pursues;The ravishers turn head, the fight renews. Dryden.
 Resistance; hostile opposition.
Then made he head against his enemies,And Hymner flew. Fairy Queen, b. ii.
Sometimes hath Henry Bolingbroke made head against my power. Shakespeare's Henry IV. p. i.
Two valiant gentlemen first making head against them, seconded by half a dozen more, made forty of them run away. Raleigh's Apology.
Sin having depraved his judgment, and got possession of his will, there is no other principle left him naturally, by which he can make head against it. South's Sermons.
 Spontaneous resolution.
The bordering wars in this kingdom were made altogether by voluntaries, upon their own head, without any pay or commission from the state. Davies on Ireland.
 State of a deer's horns, by which his age is known.
It was a buck of the first head. Shakesp. Love's Labour Lost.
The buck is called the fifth year a buck of the first head. Shak.
 Individual.  It is used in numbers or computation.
If there be six millions of people, then there is about four acres for every head. Graunt's Bills of Mortality.
 The top of any thing bigger than the rest.
His spear's head weighed six hundred shekels of iron. 1 Sa.
                As highAs his proud head is rais'd towards the sky,So low tow'rds hell his roots descend. Denham.
Trees, which have large and spreading heads, would lie with their branches up in the water. Woodward.
If the buds are made our food, they are called heads or tops; so heads of asparagus and artichoaks. Watt's Logick.
It is an equivocal term; for it signifies the head of a nail, or of a pin, as well as of an animal. Watt's Logick.
 Place of chief resort.
The horse took the alarm, and made their escape to Winchester, the head quarters. Clarendon, b. viii.
 The fore part of any thing, as of a ship.
By gallies with brazen heads she might transport over Indus at once three hundred thousand soldiers. Raleigh's History of the World.
    On oozy ground his gallies moor;Their heads are turn'd to sea, their sterns to shore. Dryden.
 That which rises on the top.
Let it stand in a tub four or five days before it be put into the cask, stirring it twice a day, and beating down the head of yeast into it. Mortimer's Husbandry.
 The blade of an axe.
A man fetcheth a stroke with the axe to cut down the tree, and the head slippeth from the helve. Deutr. xix. 5.
 Upper part of a bed.
Israel bowed upon the bed's head. Gen. xlvii. 31.
 The brain.
As eastern priests in giddy circles run,And turn their heads to imitate the sun. Pope's Essays.
 Dress of the head.
Politick ladies think they gain a great point when they have teazed their husbands to buy them a laced head, or a fine petticoat. Swift.
 Principal topicks of discourse.
These heads are of a mixed order, and we propose only such as belong to the natural world. Burnet's Theo. of the Earth.
These heads are set down more fully in the arguments of each chapter. Burnet's Theory of the Earth.
'Tis our great interest, and our chief duty, to satisfy ourselves on this head, upon which our whole conduct depends. Atterbury's Sermons, Preface.
 Source of a stream.
It is the glory of God to give; his very nature delighteth in it; he mercies in the current, through which they would pass, may be dried up, but at the head they never fail. Hooker.
The current by Gaza is but a small stream, rising between it and the Red sea, whose head from Gaza is little more than twenty English miles. Raleigh's History of the World.
Some did the song, and some the choir maintain,Beneath a laurel shade, where mighty PoMounts up to woods above, and hides his head below. Dry.
 Crisis; pitch.
The indisposition which has long hung upon me, is at last grown to such a head, that it must quickly make an end of me, or of itself. Addison's Spectator.
 Power; influence; force; strength; dominion.
Within her breast though calm, her breast though pure,Motherly cares and fears got head, and rais'dSome troubled thoughts. Milton's Paradise Regain'd.
God will not admit of the passionate man's apology, that he has so long given his unruly passions their head, that he cannot now govern nor controul them. South's Sermons.
 Body; conflux.
People under command chuse to consult, and after to march in order; and rebels, contrariwise, run upon an head together in confusion. Bacon's Henry VII.
        Let all this wicked crew gatherTheir forces to one head. Ben. Johnson's Catiline.
 Power; armed force.
My lord, my lord, the French have gather'd head. Shakes.
        At sixteen years,When Tarquin made a head for Rome, he soughtBeyond the mark of others. Shakespeare's Coriolanus.
A mighty and a fearful head they are,As ever offer'd foul play in a state. Shakesp. Henry IV.
Far in the marches here we heard you were,Making another head to fight again. Shakesp. Henry VI.
 Liberty in running a horse.
        He gave his able horse the head,And bounding forward struck his agile heelsAgainst the panting sides of his poor jadeUp to the rowel-head. Shakesp. Henry IV. p. ii.
 It is very improperly applied to roots.
How turneps hide their swelling heads below,And how the closing coleworts upwards grow. Gay.
 Head and Shoulders. By force; violently.
People that hit upon a thought that tickles them, will be still bringing it in by head and shoulders, over and over, in several companies. L'Estrange.
They can bring in every odd exception in grammar, every figure of speech, head and shoulders by main force, in spite of nature and their subject. Felton on the Classicks.

Heart-Peas
Heart-Peas. n.s. A plant.
The characteristics are: it hath a trailing stalk, emitting claspers, whereby it fastens itself to whatever plant stands near it: the flower-cup consists of three leaves, the flower of eight leaves, and are of an anomalous figure: the ovary becomes a fruit like a bladder, divided into three cells, in which are contained round seeds in form of peas, of a black colour, having the figure of an heart of a white colour upon each. Miller.

Heave (noun)
Heave. n.s. [from the verb.]

 Lift; exertion or effort upwards.
None could guess whether the next heave of the earthquake would settle them on the first foundation, or swallow them. Dryden's Don Sebastian.
 Rising of the breast.
There's matter in these sighs; these profound heavesYou must translate; 'tis fit we understand them. Shakesp.
 Effort to vomit.

 Struggle to rise.
But after many strains and heaves,He got up to his saddle eaves. Hudibras, p. i. cant. 1.

Heave (verb active)
To Heave. v.a. pret. heaved, anciently hove; part. heaved, or hoven.

 To lift; to raise from the ground.
So stretch'd out huge in length the arch fiend lay,Chain'd on the burning lake; nor ever henceHad ris'n, or heav'd his head, but that the willAnd high permission of all-ruling heavenLeft him at large. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. i.
 To carry.
        Now we bear the kingTow'rd Calais: grant him there; and there being seen,Heave him away upon your winged thoughtsAthwart the sea. Shakespeare's Henry V.
 To raise; to lift.
So daunted, when the giant saw the knight,His heavy hand he heaved up on high,And him to dust thought to have batter'd quite. Fa. Queen.
Unhappy that I am, I cannot heaveMy heart into my mouth: I love your majestyAccording to my bond, no more nor less. Shakesp. K. Lear.
                He dy'd in fight;Fought next my person, as in consort sought,Save when he heav'd his shield in my defence,And so on his naked side receiv'd my wound. Dryd. Don. Seb.
 To cause to swell.
The groans of ghosts, that cleave the earth with pain,And heave it up: they pant and stick half way. Dryden.
            The glittering finny swarms,That heave our friths and croud upon our shores. Thomson.
 To force up from the breast.
        Made she no verbal quest?— Yes, once or twice she heav'd the name of fatherPantingly forth, as if it prest her heart. Shak. King Lear.
The wretched animal heav'd forth such groans,That their discharge did stretch his leathern coatAlmost to bursting. Shakesp. As you like it.
 To exalt; to elevate.
        Poor shadow, painted queen;One heav'd on high, to be hurl'd down below. Shak. R. III.
 To puff; to elate.
The Scots, heaved up into high hope of victory, took the English for foolish birds fallen into their net, forsook their hill, and marched into the plain. Hayward.

Heave (verb neuter)
To Heave. v.n.

 To pant; to breathe with pain.
                'Tis such as you,That creep like shadows by him, and do sighAt each his needless heavings; such as youNourish the cause of his awaking. Shakesp. Winter's Tale.
He heaves for breath, which, from his lungs supply'd,And fetch'd from far, distends his lab'ring side. Dryden.
 To labour.
The church of England had struggled and heaved at a reformation ever since Wickliff's days. Atterbury.
 To rise with pain; to swell and fall.
        Thou hast made my curdled blood run back,My heart heave up, my hair to rise in bristles. Dryden.
The wand'ring breath was on the wing to part;Weak was the pulse, and hardly heav'd the heart. Dryden.
No object affects my imagination so much as the sea or ocean: I cannot see the heaving of this prodigious bulk of waters, even in a calm, without a very pleasing astonishment. Addison's Spectator.
Frequent for breath his panting bosom heaves. Prior.
            The heaving tideIn widen'd circles beats on either side. Gay's Trivia.
 To keck; to feel a tendency to vomit.

Heave Offering
Heave Offering. n.s. An offering among the Jews.
Ye shall offer a cake of the first of your dough for an heave offering, as ye do the heave offering of the threshing floor. Num.

Heavily


Heaviness


Heavy (adjective)


Heavy (adverb)


Hebdomad
Hébdomad. n.s. [hebdomas, Latin.] A week; a space of seven days.
 Computing by the medical month, the first hebdomad or septenary consists of six days, seventeen hours and a half. Brown.

Hebdomadal


Hebdomadary


Hebetate
To Hebétate. v.a. [hebeto, Latin; hebeter, French.] To dull; to blunt; to stupify.
 The eye, especially if hebetated, might cause the same perception. Harvey on Consumptions.
 Beef may confer a robustness on the limbs of my son, but will hebetate and clog his intellectuals. Arb. and Pope's M. Scrib.

Hebetation
Hebetátion. n.s. [from hebetate.]

 The act of dulling.

 The state of being dulled.

Hebetude
Hébetude. n.s. [hebetudo, Latin.] Dulness; obtuseness; bluntness.
 The pestilent seminaries, according to their grossness or subtilty, activity or hebetude, cause more or less truculent plagues. Harvey on the Plague.

Hebraism
Hébraism. n.s. [hebraisme, French; hebraismus, Latin.] A Hebrew idiom.
 Milton has infused a great many Latinisms, as well as Græcisms, and sometimes Hebraisms, into his poem. Spectator.

Hebraist
Hébraist. n.s. [hebræus, Latin.] A man skilled in Hebrew.

Hebrician
Hébrician. n.s. [from Hebrew.] One skilful in Hebrew.
 The words are more properly taken for the air or ether than the heavens, as the best Hebrecians understand them. Raleigh.
 The nature of the Hebrew verse, as the meanest Hebrician knoweth, consists of uneven feet. Peacham.

Hecatomb
Hécatomb. n.s. [hecatombe, French; ἐκατόμβη.] A sacrifice of an hundred cattle.
                 In rich mens homes I bid kill some beats, but no hecatombs; None starve, none surfeit so. Donne.
 One of these three is a whole hecatomb, And therefore only one of them shall die. Dryden.
     Her triumphant sons in war succeed, And slaughter'd hecatombs around 'em bleed. Addison.

Hectical


Hectick (adjective)


Hectick (noun)


Hector (noun)
Héctor. n.s. [from the name of Hector, the great Homeric warriour.]

 A bully; a blustering, turbulent, pervicacious, noisy fellow.
 Those usurping hectors, who pretend to honour without religion, think the charge of a lye a blot not to be washed out but by blood. South's Sermons.
 We'll take one cooling cup of nectar,And drink to this celestial hector. Prior.

Hector (verb active)


Heir (noun)
Heir. n.s. [heire, old Fr. hæres, Latin.] One that is inheritor of anything after the present possessor.
An heir signifies the eldest, who is, by the laws of England, to have all his father's land. Locke.
           What lady is that? — The heir of Alanson, Rosaline her name. Shakespeare.
         That I'll give my voice on Richard's side, To bar my master's heirs in true descent, God knows, I will not do it. Shakesp. Richard III.
Being heirs together of the grace of life. 1 Pet iii. 7.
The youngest extravagant heir had got a new steward, and was resolved to look into his estate before things grew desperate. Swift.
Sunk is the hero, and his glory lost, And I his heir in misery alone. Pope's Odyssey.
The heirs to titles and large estates have a weakness in their eyes, and a tenderness in their constitutions. Swift.

Heir (verb)
To Heir. v.a. [from the noun.] To inherit.
His sons in blooming youth were snatched by fate; One only daughter heir'd the royal state. Dryden's Æn.

Heiress
He'iress. n.s. [from heir.] An inheritrix; a woman that inherits.
An heiress she, while yet alive; All that was her's to him did give. Waller.
Æneas, though he married the heiress of the crown, yet claimed no title to it during the life of his father-in-law. Dryd.

Heirless
He'irless. adj. [from heir.] Without an heir; wanting one to inherit after him.
                         I still think of The wrong I did myself; which was so much, That heirless it hath made my kingdom. Shakes. Wint. Tale.

Heirloom
He'irloom. n.s. [heir and ᵹloma, goods, Sax.] Any furniture or moveable decreed to descend by inheritance, and therefore inseparable from the freehold.
Achilles' sceptre was of wood, Transmitted to the hero's line; Thence through a long descent of kings Came an heirloom, as Homer sings. Swift.

Heirship
He'irship. n.s. [from heir.] The state, or character, or privileges of an heir.
A layman appoints an heir or an executor in his will, to build an hospital within a year, under pain of being deprived of his heirship. Ayliffe's Parergon.

Heliacal
Heli'acal. adj. [helioque, Fr. from ἥλιος.] Emerging from the lustre of the sun, or falling into it.
Had they ascribed the heat of the season to this star, they would not have computed from its heliacal ascent. Bacon.

Heliacally
He'liacally. adv. [from heliacal.]
From the rising of this star, not  cosmically, that is, with the sun, but heliacally, that is, its emersion from the rays of the sun, the ancients computed in their canicular days. Brown.
He is tempestuous in the Summer, when he rises heliacally; and rainy in the Winter, when he rises achronically. Dryden.

Helical
He'lical. adv. [helice, Fr. from ἕλιξ.] Spiral; with many circumvolutions.
The screw is a kind of wedge, multiplied or continued by a helical revolution about a cylinder, receiving its motion not from any stroke, but from a vectis at one end of it. Wilkins.

Heliocentrick
Helioce'ntrick. adj. [heliocentrique, Fr. ἥλιος, and κέντρον.] The heliocentrick place of a planet is said to be such as it would appear to us from the sun, if our eye were fixed in its centre.  Harris.

Helioid Parabola
He'lioid Parabola, in mathematicks, or the parabolick spiral, is a curve which arises from the supposition of the axis of the common Apollonian parabola's being bent round into the periphery of a circle, and is a line then passing through the extremities of the ordinates, which do now converge towards the centre of the said circle.  Harris.

Helioscope
He'lioscope. n.s. [helioscope, Fr. ἥλιος and σκοπέω.] A sort of telescope fitted so as to look on the body of the sun, without offence to the eyes. Harris.

Helix
Hélix. n.s. [helice, Fr. ἕλιξ.] A spiral line; a circumvolution.
Find the true inclination of the screw, together with the certain quantity of water which every helix does contain. Wilkin's Dædalus.

Hell
Hell. n.s. [hll, Saxon.]

 The place of the devil and wicked souls.
                  For it is a knell That summons thee to heaven, or to hell. Shakes. Macbeth.
 If a man were a porter of hell gates, he should have old turning the key. Shakespeare's Macbeth.
                      Let none admire That riches grow in hell; that soil may best Deserve the precious bane. Milton.
 Hell's black tyrant trembled to behold The glorious light he forfeited of old. Cowley.
 The place of separate souls, whether good or bad.
 I will go down to my son mourning to hell. Gen. vi. 35.
 He descended into hell. Apostles Creed.
 Temporal death.
 The pains of hell came about me; the snares of death overtook me. Psalm xviii. 4.
 The place at a running play to which those who are caught are carried.
 Then couples three be straight allotted there; They of both ends the middle two do fly; The two that in mid-place, hell called were, Must strive with waiting foot, and watching eye, To catch of them, and them to hell bear, That they, as well as they, hell may supply. Sidney.
 The place into which the taylor throws his shreds.
 This trusty squire, he had, as well As the bold Trojan knight, seen hell; Not with a counterfeited pass Of golden bough, but true gold lace. Hudibras, p. i.
 In Covent-garden did a taylor dwell, Who might deserve a place in his own hell. King's Cookery.
 The infernal powers.
 Much danger first, much did he sustain, While Saul and hell crost his strong fate in vain. Cowley.
 It is used in composition by the old writers more than by the modern.

Hell-black
Hell-black. adj. Black as hell.
The sea, which such a storm as his bare head
In hell-black night endur'd, would have boil'd up, And quench'd the stelled fires. Shakesp. King Lear.

Helminthick
Helmínthick. adj. [from ἕλμινθος.] Relating to worms. Dict.

Hemicrany
He'micrany. n.s. [ἥμισυ, half, and κράνιον, the skull, or head.] A pain that affects only one part of the head at a time. Quincy.

Hemisphere
He'misphere. n.s. [ἡμισφᾶιριον; hemisphere, French.] The half of a globe when it is supposed to be cut through its centre in the plane of one of its greatest circles.
That place is earth, the seat of man; that light His day, which else, as th' other hemisphere, Night would invade. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. iii.
           God saw the light was good, And light from darkness by the hemisphere Divided. Milton's Paradise Lost, b. vii.
                         A hill Of paradise, the highest from whose top The hemisphere of earth, in clearest ken Stretch'd out to th' amplest reach of prospect lay. Milt. P. L.
The sun is more powerful in the northern hemisphere, and in the apogeum; for therein his motion is slower. Brown.
In open prospect nothing bounds our eye, Until the earth seems join'd unto the sky; So in this hemisphere our utmost view Is only bounded by our king and you. Dryden.

Here
Here. adv. [her, Saxon; hier, Dutch.]

 In this place.
             Before thy here approach, Old Siward, with ten thousand warlike men, All ready at appoint, was setting forth. Shakesp. Macbeth.
         I, upon my frontiers here, Keep residence. Milton.
         Here nature first begins Her farthest verge. Milton.
 How wretched does Prometheus' state appear, While he his second mis'ry suffers here! Cowley.
 To-day is ours, we have it here. Cowley.
 In the present state.
Thus shall you be happy here, and more happy hereafter. Bacon's Advice to Villiers.
 It is used in making an offer or attempt.
         Then here's for earnest: 'Tis finish'd, and the dusk that yet remains Is but the native horrour of the wood. Dryden's K. Arthur.
 However, friend, here's to the king, one cries; To him who was the king, the friend replies. Prior.
 It is often opposed to there. Dispersedly; in one place and another.
 Good-night: mine eyes do itch;Doth that bode weeping?— 'Tis neither here nor there. Shakespeare's Othello.
 We are come to see thee fight, to see thee foigne, to see thee traverse, to see thee here, to see thee there. Shakespeare.
 Then this, then that man's aid, they crave, implore; Post here for help, seek there their followers. Daniel.
 I would have in the heath some thickets made only of sweet briar and honey-suckle, and some wild vine amongst; and the ground set with violets; for these are sweet, and prosper in the shade; and these to be in the heath here and there, not in order. Bacon's Essays.
 The devil might perhaps, by inward suggestions, have drawn in here and there a single proselyte. Gover. of the Tongue.
 You remember how your city, after the dreadful fire, was rebuilt, not presently, by raising continued streets in any one part; but at first here a house, and there a house, to which others by degrees were joined. Spratt's Sermons.
 He that rides post through a country may be able to give some loose description of here a mountain and there a plain, here a morass and there a river, woodland in one part, and savanas in another. Locke.
 Here seems, in the following passage, to mean this place.
 Bid them farewel, Cordelia, though unkind; Thou losest here, a better where to find. Shakesp. K. Lear.

Heresiarch
Héresiarch. n.s. [heresiarque, French; ἅιρεσις and ἀρχὴ.] A leader in heresy; the head of a herd of hereticks.
The pope declared him not only an heretick, but an heresiarch. Stillingfleet.

Heterogeneous
Heterogéneous. adj. [ἕτερος and γένος.] Not kindred; opposite or dissimilar in nature.
I have with great care observed the condition of such heterogeneous bodies, which I found immersed and included in the mass of this sandstone. Woodward.

Heteroscians
Heteróscians. n.s. [ἑτερος and σκία.] Those whose shadows fall only one way, as the shadows of us who live north of the Tropick fall at noon always to the North.

Hexagon
Héxagon. n.s. [hexagone, French; ἕξ and γωνία.] A figure of six sides or angles: the most capacious of all the figures that can be added to each other without any interstice; and therefore the cells in honeycombs are of that form.

Hexapod
Hexápod. n.s. [ἕξ and πόδες.] An animal with six feet.
 I take those to have been the hexapods, from which the greater sort of beetles come; for that sort of hexapods are eaten in America. Ray on the Creation.

Hexastick
Hexástick. n.s. [ἕξ and στίχος.] A poem of six lines.

Heydegives
Héydegives. n.s. A wild frolick dance.
 But friendly fairys met with many graces, And light-foot nymphs can chase the ling'ring night With heydegives, and trimly trodden traces. Spenser.

Hiation
Hiátion. n.s. [from hio, Latin.] The act of gaping.
Men observing the continual hiation, or holding open its mouth, conceive the intention thereof to receive the aliment of air; but this is also occasioned by the greatness of the lungs. Brown's Vulgar Errours

Hiccius Doccius
Hiccius Doccius. n.s. [corrupted, I fancy, from hic est doctus,  this or here is the learned man. Used by jugglers of themselves.] A cant word for a juggler; one that plays fast and loose.
 An old dull sot, who told the clock For many years at Bridewell dock, At Westminster and Hicks's hall, And hiccius doccius play'd in all; Where, in all governments and times, H' had been both friend and foe to crimes. Hudibras, p. iii.

Higgle
To Híggle. v.n. [of uncertain etymology; probably corrupted from haggle.]

 To chaffer; to be penurious in a bargain.
In good offices and due retributions we may not be pinching and niggardly: it argues an ignoble mind, where we have wronged, to higgle and dodge in the amends. Hale.
        Base thou art!To higgle thus for a few blows,To gain thy knight an op'lent spouse. Hudibras, p. ii.
Why all this higgling with thy friend about such a paultry sum? Does this become the generosity of the noble and rich John Bull? Arbuthnot's History of John Bull.
 To go selling provisions from door to door.  This seems the original meaning.

Higgledy-piggeldy
Higgledy-piggeldy. adv. A cant word, corrupted from higgle, which denotes any confused mass, as higglers carry a huddle of provisions together.

Higgler
Híggler. n.s. [from higgle.] One who sells provisions by retail.

Historian
Histórian. n.s. [historicus, Latin; historien, French.] A writer of facts and events; a writer of history.
 What thanks sufficient, or what recompence Equal, have I to render thee, divine Historian! Milton's Paradise Lost, b. viii.
 Our country, which has produced writers of the first figure in every other kind of work, has been very barren in good historians. Addison's Freeholder.
 Not added years on years my task could close, The long historian of my country's woes. Pope's Odyssey.

Historify
To Histórify. v.a. [from history.] To relate; to record in history.
                     O, muse, historify Her praise, whose praise to learn your skill hath framed me. Sidney, b. i.
 The third age they term historicon; that is, such wherein matters have been more truely historified, and therefore may be believed. Brown's Vulgar Errours, b. vi. c. 6.

History
Hístory. n.s. [ἱστορία; historia, Latin; histoire, French.]

 A narration of events and facts delivered with dignity.
 Justly Cæsar scorns the poet's lays; It is to history he trusts for praise. Pope.
 Narration; relation.
 The history part lay within a little room. Wiseman's Surgery.
What histories of toil could I declare?But still long-weary'd nature wants repair. Pope's Odyssey.
 The knowledge of facts and events.
 History, so far as it relates to the affairs of the Bible, is necessary to divines. Watt's Improvement of the Mind.

History Piece
Hístory Piece. n.s. A picture representing some memorable event.
 The former makes his works resemble a large history piece, where even the less important figures have some convenient place. Pope's Essay on Homer's Battles.

Hog
Hog. n.s. [hwch, Welsh.]

 The general name of swine.
This will raise the price of hogs, if we grow all to be porkeaters. Shakespeare's Merchant of Venice.
The hog, that plows not nor obeys thy call,Lives on the labours of this Lord of all. Pope.
 A castrated boar.

 To bring Hogs to a fair market. To fail of one's design.
You have brought your hogs to a fair market. Spectator.

Hogshead
Hógshead. n.s. [hog and head.]

 A measure of liquids containing sixty gallons.
Varro tells, that every jugerum of vines yielded six hundred urns of wine: according to this proportion, our acre should yield fifty-five hogsheads, and a little more. Arbuthnot on Coins.
 Any large barrel.
Blow strongly with a pair of bellows into a hogshead, putting into it before that which you would have preserved; and in the instant that you withdraw the bellows, stop the hole. Bacon.
They flung up one of their largest hogsheads: I drank it off; for it did not hold half a pint. Gulliver's Travels.

Hold (1)
Hold, in the old glossaries, is mentioned in the same sense with wold, i.e. a governour or chief officer; but in some other place for love, as holdlic, lovely. Gibson's Camden.

Hold (verb active)
To Hold. v.a. preter. held; part. pass. held or holden. [haldan, Gothick; haldan, Saxon; henden, Dutch.]

 To grasp in the hand; to gripe; to clutch.
 France, thou may'st hold a serpent by the tongue, A fasting tyger safer by the tooth, Than keep in peace that hand which thou do'st hold. Shak.
 To keep; to retain; to gripe fast.
 Too late it was for satyrs to be told, Or ever hope recover her again; In vain he seeks, that having cannot hold. Fairy Queen.
 The loops held one curtain to another. Ex. xxxvi. 12.
 Prove all things: hold fast that which is good. 2 Thes. v.
 To maintain as an opinion.
 Men with assurance hold and profess, without ever having examined. Locke.
 To consider as good or bad; to hold in regard.
 I as a stranger to my heart and me Hold thee from this for ever. Shakesp. King Lear.
 I hold him but a fool, that will endanger His body for a girl that loves him not. Shakespeare.
 One amongst the fair'st of Greece, That holds his honour higher than his ease. Shakespeare.
 This makes thee blessed peace so light to hold, Like Summer's flies that fear not Winter's cold. Fairfax.
 Receive him therefore in the Lord with all gladness, and hold such in esteem. St. Paul.
 He would make us amends, and spend some time with us, if we held his company and conference agreeable. Bacon.
 As he is the father of English poetry, so I hold him in the same degree of veneration as the Grecians held Homer, or the Romans Virgil. Dryden's Fables, Preface.
             Ye Latian dames, if any here Hold your unhappy queen Amata dear! The orgies and nocturnal rites prepare. Dryden's Æn.
 To have any station.
 The star bids the shepherd fold; Now the top of heav'n doth hold. Milton.
 And now the strand, and now the plain they held; Their ardent eyes with bloody streaks were fill'd. Dryden.
 Observe the youth who first appears in sight, And holds the nearest station to the light. Dryden's Æn.
 How pleasant and joyful a thing is it to have a light held us forth from heaven to guide our steps. Cheyne's Phil. Princ.
 To possess; to enjoy.
 Holding Corioli in the name of Rome, Even like a fawning greyhound in the leash, To let him slip at will. Shakespeare's Coriolanus.
 The castle, holden by a garrison of Germans, he commanded to be besieged. Knolles's History of the Turks.
 Assuredly it is more shame for a man to lose that which he holdeth, than to fail in getting that which he never had. Hayw.
 To possess in subordination.
 The duke was willing to yield himself unto Solyman as his vassal, and of him to hold his seigniory for a yearly tribute. Knolles's History of the Turks.
 To suspend; to refrain.
 Death! what do'st? O hold thy blow! What thou do'st, thou do'st not know. Crashaw.
 To stop; to restrain.
 We cannot hold mortality's strong hand. Shak. K. John.
 Fell, banning hag! inchantress, hold thy tongue. Shakesp.
 Men in the midst of their own blood, and so furiously assailed, held their hands, contrary to the laws of nature and necessity. Bacon's War with Spain.
 When straight the people, by no force compell'd, Nor longer from their inclination held, Break forth at once. Waller.
 Unless thou find occasion, hold thy tongue; Thyself or others, careless talk may wrong. Denham.
 Hold your laughter, and then divert your fellow-servants. Swift's Directions to the Footman.
 To fix to any condition.
             His gracious promise you might, As cause had call'd you up, have held him to. Shak. Coriol.
 To preserve; to keep.
 Stay but a little; for my cloud of dignity Is held from falling with so weak a wind, That it will quickly drop: my day is dim. Shakes. Hen. IV.
 To confine to a certain state.
 The most High then shewed signs for then, and held still the flood, 'till they were passed over. 2 Esdr. xiii. 14.
 To detain.
 Him God hath raised up, having loosed the pains of death, because it was not possible that he should be holden of it. Acts.
 To retain; to continue.
 These reasons mov'd her star-like husband's heart; But still he held his purpose to depart. Dryden.
 To solemnize; to celebrate.
 The queen this day here holds her parliament, But little thinks we shall be of her council. Shakesp. H. VI.
 He held a feast in his house, like the feast of a king. 1 Sa.
 To offer; to propose.
 Christianity came into the world with the greatest simplicity of thought and language, as well as life and manners, holding forth nothing but piety, charity, and humility, with the belief of the Messiah and of his kingdom. Temple.
 My account is so far from interfering with Moses, that it holds forth a natural and unforced interpretation of his sense. Woodward's Natural History.
 To conserve; not to violate.
 Her husband heard it, and held his peace. Numb. xxx. 7.
 She said, and held her peace: Æneas went, Unknowing whom the sacred sibyl meant. Dryden's Æn.
 To manage; to handle intellectually.
 Some in their discourse desire rather commendation of wit, in being able to hold all arguments, than of judgment in discerning what is true. Bacon, Essay 33.
 To maintain.
 Whereupon they also made engines against their engines, and held them battle a long season. 1 Mac. vi. 52.
 To form; to plan.
 The Pharisees went out, and held a counsel against him. Mat. xii. 14.
 To carry on; to continue.
 He came to the land's end, where he holding his course, in a narrow passage towards the West, for the space of divers days, did at length peaceably pass through the straits. Abbot.
 To Hold forth. To offer to exhibit.
 Observe the connection of these ideas in the propositions, which those books hold forth and pretend to teach as truths. Locke.
 To Hold in. To restrain; to govern by the bridle.
 I have lately sold my nag, and honestly told his greatest fault, which is, that he became such a lover of liberty that I could scarce hold him in. Swift.
 To Hold in. To restrain in general.
 These mens hastiness the warier sort of you doth not commend; ye wish they had held themselves longer in, and not so dangerously flown abroad. Hooker, Preface.
 To Hold off. To keep at a distance.
         Although 'tis fit that Cassio have his place; Yet if you please to hold him off a while, You shall by that perceive him. Shakespeare's Othello.
 The object of sight doth strike upon the pupil of the eye directly, without any interception; whereas the cave of the ear doth hold off the sound a little from the organ. Bacon.
 I am the better acquainted with you for absence, as men are with themselves for affliction: absence does but hold off a friend, to make one see him truly. Pope to Swift.
 To Hold on. To continue; to protract; to push forward.
 They took Barbarossa, holding on his course to Africk, who brought great fear upon the country. Knolles's Hist. of the Turks.
 If the obedience challenged were indeed due to these laws, then did our brethren both begin the quarrel and hold it on. Sanderson's Judgment in one View.
 To Hold out. To extend; to stretch forth.
 The king held out to Esther the golden sceptre that was in his hand. Esth. v. 2.
 To Hold out. To offer; to propose.
 Fortune holds out these to you, as rewards. Ben. Johnson.
 To Hold out. To continue to do or suffer.
 He cannot long hold out these pangs, Th' incessant care and labour of his mind. Shakes. H. IV.
 To Hold up. To raise aloft.
 I should remember him: does he not hold up his head, as it were, and strut in his gait? Shakes. Merry Wives of Windsor.
 The hand of the Almighty visibly held up, and prepared to take vengeance. Locke.
 To Hold up. To sustain; to support.
 There is no man at once either excellently good or extremely evil, but grows either as he holds himself up in virtue, or lets himself slide to viciousness. Sidney.
 It followeth, that all which they do in this sort proceedeth originally from some such agent as knoweth, appointeth, holdeth up, and actually frameth the same. Hooker, b. i. s. 3.
 The time misorder'd doth in common sense Crowd us, and crush us to this monstrous form, To hold our safety up. Shakespeare's Henry IV. p. ii.
         And so success of mischief shall be born, And heir from heir shall hold his quarrel up. Shakes. H. IV.
 Those princes have held up their sovereignty best, which have been sparing in those grants. Davies on Ireland.
 We have often made one considerably thick piece of marble take and hold up another, having purposely caused their flat surfaces to be carefully ground and polished. Boyle.
 Then do not strike him dead with a denial, But hold him up in life, and cheer his soul With the faint glimmering of a doubtful hope. Addis. Cato.

Hook (noun)
Hook. n.s. [hoce, Saxon; hoeck, Dutch.]

 Any thing bent so as to catch hold: as, a shepherd's hook and pot hooks.
This falling not, for that they had not far enough undermined it, they assayed with great hooks and strong ropes to have pulled it down. Knolles.
 The curvated wire on which the bait is hung for fishes, and with which the fish is pierced.
          Like unto golden hooks,That from the foolish fish their baits do hide. Spenser.
    My bended hook shall pierceTheir slimy jaws. Shakes. Ant. and Cleopatra.
Though divine Plato thus of pleasures thought,They us with hooks and baits, like fishes, caught. Denham.
 A snare; a trap.
    A shop of all the qualities that manLoves women for, besides that hook of wiving,Fairness, which strikes the eye. Shakesp. Cymbeline.
 A sickle to reap corn.
Pease are commonly reaped with a hook at the end of a long stick. Mortimer's Husbandry.
 An iron to seize the meat in the caldron.
About the caldron many cooks accoil'd,With hooks and ladles, as need did require;The while the viands in the vessel boil'd. Fairy Queen, b. ii.
 Any instrument to cut or lop with.
Not that I'd lop the beauties from his book,Like slashing Bentley with his desperate hook. Pope.
 The part of the hinge fixed to the post: whence the proverb, off the hooks, for in disorder.
              My doublet looks,Like him that wears it, quite off o' the hooks. Cleaveland.
She was horribly bold, meddling and expensive, easily put off the hooks, and monstrous hard to be pleased again. L'Estr.
While Sheridan is off the hooks,And friend Delany at his books. Swift.
 Hook. [In husbandry.] A field sown two years running. Ains.

 Hook or Crook. One way or other; by any expedient; by any means direct or oblique.
Which he by hook or crook had gather'd,And for his own inventions father'd. Hudibras, p. iii.
He would bring him by hook or crook into his quarrel. Dryd.

Horse (noun)
Horse. n.s. [hors, Saxon.]

 A neighing quadruped, used in war, and draught and carriage.
Duncan's horses, the minions of the race,Turn'd wild in nature, broke their stalls. Shakesp. Macbeth.
A horse! a horse! my kingdom for a horse! Shak. R. III.
I would sell my horse, and buy ten moreBetter than he. Shakesp. Timon of Athens.
Thy face, bright centaur, Autumn's heats retain,The softer season suiting to the man;Whilst Winter's shivering goat afflicts the horseWith frost, and makes him an uneasy coarse. Creech.
We call a little horse, such a one as comes not up to the size of that idea which we have in our minds to belong ordinarily to horses. Locke.
I took horse to the lake of Constance, which is formed by the entry of the Rhine. Addison on Italy.
 It is used in the plural sense, but with a singular termination, for horses, horsemen, or cavalry.
          I did hearThe galloping of horse: who was't came by? Shak. Macb.
The armies were appointed, consisting of twenty-five thousand horse and foot, for the repulsing of the enemy at their landing. Bacon's War with Spain.
If they had known that all the king's horse were quartered behind them, their foot might very well have marched away with their horse. Clarendon, b. viii.
          Th' Arcadian horseWith ill success engage the Latin force. Dryden's Æn.
 Something on which any thing is supported; as, a horse to dry linnen on.

 A wooden machine which soldiers ride by way of punishment.  It is sometimes called a timber-mare.

 Joined to another substantive, it signifies something large or coarse: as, a horseface, a face of which the features are large and indelicate.

Horticulture
Horticúlture. n.s. [hortus and cultura, Latin.] The art of cultivating gardens.

Hotchpotch
Hótchpotch. n.s. [haché en poche, French; or hachee en pot, French, as Camden has it, as being boiled up in a pot; yet the former corruption is now generally used.] A mingled hash; a mixture.
 Such patching maketh Littleton's hotchpot of our tongue, and, in effect, brings the same rather to a Babellish confusion than any one entire language. Camden's Remains.
 A mixture of many disagreeing colours is ever unpleasant to the eye, and a mixture or hotchpotch of many tastes is unpleasant to the taste. Bacon's Natural History.
 Nor limbs, nor bones, nor carcass would remain; But a mash'd heap, a hotchpotch of the slain. Dryd. Juvenal.

House (noun)
House. n.s. [hus, Saxon; huys, Dutch; huse, Scottish.]

 A place wherein a man lives; a place of human abode.
Sparrows must not build in his house eaves. Shakespeare.
Houses are built to live in, not to look on; therefore let use be preferred before uniformity, except where both may be had. Bacon, Essay 46.
In a house the doors are moveable, and the rooms square; yet the house is neither moveable nor square. Watts.
 Any place of abode.
The bees with smoke, the doves with noisome stench,Are from their hives and houses driven away. Shakespeare.
 Place in which religious or studious persons live in common; monastery; college.
Theodosius arrived at a religious house in the city, where now Constantia resided. Addison's Spectator.
 The manner of living; the table.
He kept a miserable house, but the blame was laid wholly upon madam. Swift.
 Station of a planet in the heavens, astrologically considered.
Pure spiritual substances we cannot converse with, therefore have need of means of communication, which some make to be the celestial houses: those who are for the celestial houses worship the planets, as the habitations of intellectual substances that animate them. Stillingfleet.
 Family of ancestors, descendants, and kindred; race.
The red rose and the white are on his face,The fatal colours of our striving houses. Shakes. Henry VI.
An ignominious ransom and free pardonAre of two houses; lawful mercy sureIs nothing kin to soul redemption. Shak. Meas. for Measure.
By delaying my last fine, upon your grace's accession to the patrimonies of your house, I may seem to have made a forfeiture. Dryden's Fables, Dedication.
A poet is not born in ev'ry race;Two of a house few ages can afford,One to perform, another to record. Dryden's Fables.
 A body of parliament; the lords or commons collectively considered.
Nor were the crimes objected against him so clear, as to give convincing satisfaction to the major part of both houses, especially that of the lords. King Charles.

Houseleek
Ho'useleek. n.s. [house and leek.] A plant.
The flower consists of several leaves, which are placed orbicularly, and expanded in form of a rose; out of whose flower-cup rises the pointal, which afterwards turns to a fruit, composed, as it were, of many seed-vessels resembling husks, which are collected into a sort of head, and full of small seeds.  The species are six. Miller.
The acerbs supply their quantity of cruder acids; as juices of apples, grapes, the sorrels, and houseleek. Floyer.

Hove
Hove. The preterite of heave.

Hoven
Hóven. part. pass. [from heave.] Raised; swelled; tumefied.
 Tom Piper hath hoven and puffed up cheeks;If cheese be so hoven, make Cisse to seek creeks. Tusser.

Huff (noun)
Huff. n.s. [from hove, or hoven, swelled: he is huffed up by distempers. So in some provinces we still say the bread huffs up, when it begins to heave or ferment: huff, therefore, may be ferment. To be in a huff is then to be in a ferment, as we now speak.]

 Swell of sudden anger or arrogance.
 Quoth Ralpho, honour's but a word To swear by only in a lord; In others it is but a huff, To vapour with instead of proof. Hudibras, p. ii.
 His frowns kept multitudes in awe, Before the bluster of whose huff All hats, as in a storm, flew off. Hudibras.
 We have the apprehensions of a change to keep a check upon us in the  very huff of our greatness. L'Estrange.
 A Spaniard was wonderfully upon the huff about his extraction. L'Estrange.
 No man goes about to ensnare or circumvent another in a passion, to lay train, and give secret blows in a present huff. South's Sermons.
 A wretch swelled with a false opinion of his own value.
 Lewd shallow-brained huffs make atheism and contempt of religion the sole badge and character of wit. South.
 As for you, colonel huff-cap, we shall try before a civil magistrate who's the greater plotter. Dryden's Spanish Fryar.

Humect
To Huméct.To Huméctate.

v.a. [humecto, Latin; humecter, Fr.] To wet; to moisten.


The Nile and Niger do not only moisten and contemperate the air by their exhalations, but refresh and humectate the earth by their annual inundations. Brown's Vulgar Errours.
Her rivers are wheeled up into small cataracts, and so divided into sluices, to humectate the bordering soil, and make it wonderfully productive. Howel's Vocal Forrest.
The medicaments are of a cool humecting quality, and not too much astringent. Wiseman's Surgery.

Humectate
To Huméct.To Huméctate.

v.a. [humecto, Latin; humecter, Fr.] To wet; to moisten.


The Nile and Niger do not only moisten and contemperate the air by their exhalations, but refresh and humectate the earth by their annual inundations. Brown's Vulgar Errours.
Her rivers are wheeled up into small cataracts, and so divided into sluices, to humectate the bordering soil, and make it wonderfully productive. Howel's Vocal Forrest.
The medicaments are of a cool humecting quality, and not too much astringent. Wiseman's Surgery.

Hyacinth
Hýacinth. n.s. [ὑάκινθος; hyacinthe, Fr. hyacinthus, Lat.]

 A plant.
It hath a bulbous root: the leaves are long and narrow: the stalk is upright and naked, the flowers growing on the upper part in a spike: the flowers consist each of one leaf, are naked, tubulose, and cut into six divisions at the brim, which are reflexed: the ovary becomes a roundish fruit with three angles, which is divided into three cells, which are filled with roundish seeds. Miller.
The silken fleece, impurpl'd for the loom,Rival'd the hyacinth in vernal bloom. Pope's Odyssey.
 The hyacinth is the same with the lapis lyncurius of the ancients.  It is a less shewy gem than any of the other red ones, but not without its beauty, though not gaudy.  It is seldom smaller than a seed of hemp, or larger than a nutmeg.  It is found of various degrees of deepness and paleness; but its colour is always a deadish red, with a considerable admixture of yellow, which even sometimes seems predominant: but its most usual is that mixed red and yellow, which we know by the name of flame-colour.  This gem is found in several parts of Europe; but the finest sort comes from the East and West Indies. Hill on Fossils.

Hyper
Hýper. n.s. [A word barbarously curtailed by Prior from hypercritick.] A hypercritick; one more critical than necessity requires. Prior did not know the meaning of the word.
Criticks I read on other men,And hypers upon them again. Prior.

Hyperbola
Hypérbola. n.s. [hyperbole, Fr. ὕπερ and βάλλω.] In geometry, a section of a cone made by a plane, so that the axis of the section inclines to the opposite leg of the cone, which in the parabola is parallel to it, and in the ellipsis intersects it.  The axis of the hyperbolical section will meet also with the opposite side of the cone, when produced above the vertex. Harris.
Had the velocities of the several planets been greater or less than they are, or had their distances from the sun, or the quantity of the sun's matter, and consequently his attractive power been greater or less than they are now, with the same velocities, they would not have revolved in concentrick circles, but have moved in hyperbola's very eccentrick. Bentley's Serm.

Hyperbole
Hýperbole. n.s. [hyperbole, Fr. ὑπερβολὴ.] A figure in rhetorick by which any thing is increased or diminished beyond the exact truth: as, he runs faster than lightning. His possessions are fallen to dust.  He was so gaunt, the case of a flagellet was a mansion for him. Shakesp.
            Terms unsquar'd,Which, from the tongue of roaring Typhon dropt,Would seem hyperboles. Shakes. Troilus and Cressida.
Taffata phrases, silken terms precise,Three pil'd hyperboles, spruce affectation,Figures pedantical, these Summer flies,Have blown me full of maggot ostentation. Shakespeare.
They were above the hyperboles, that fond poetry bestows upon its admired objects. Glanv. Sceps. c. 1.
Hyperboles, so daring and so bold,Disdaining bounds, and yet by rules control'd;Above the clouds, but yet within our sight,They mount with truth, and make a tow'ring flight. Granv.
The common people understand raillery, or at least rhetorick, and will not take hyperboles in too literal a sense. Swift.

Hyperbolical
Hyperbólical.Hyperbólick.

adj. [hyperbolique, French; from hyperbola.]



 Belonging to the hyperbola; having the nature of an hyperbola.
Cancellated in the middle with squares, with triangles before, and behind with hyperbolick lines. Grew's Musæum.
The horny or pellucid coat of the eye riseth up, as a hillock, above the convexity of the white of the eye, and is of an hyperbolical or parabolical figure. Ray on the Creation.
 [From hyperbole.] Exaggerating or extenuating beyond fact.
It is parabolical, and probably hyperbolical, and therefore not to be taken in a strict sense. Boyle.

Hyperbolically
Hyperbólically. adv. [from hyperbolical.]

 In form of an hyperbola.

 With exaggeration or extenuation.
Yet may all be solved, if we take it hyperbolically. Brown.
Scylla is seated upon a narrow mountain, which thrusts into the sea a steep high rock, and hyperbolically described by Homer as inaccessible. Broome's Notes on the Odyssey.

Hyperbolick
Hyperbólical.Hyperbólick.

adj. [hyperbolique, French; from hyperbola.]



 Belonging to the hyperbola; having the nature of an hyperbola.
Cancellated in the middle with squares, with triangles before, and behind with hyperbolick lines. Grew's Musæum.
The horny or pellucid coat of the eye riseth up, as a hillock, above the convexity of the white of the eye, and is of an hyperbolical or parabolical figure. Ray on the Creation.
 [From hyperbole.] Exaggerating or extenuating beyond fact.
It is parabolical, and probably hyperbolical, and therefore not to be taken in a strict sense. Boyle.

Hyperboliform
Hyperbóliform. adj. [hyperbola and forma.] Having the form, or nearly the form of the hyperbola.

Hyperborean
Hyperbórean. n.s. [hyperboreen, French; hyperboreus, Lat.] Northern.

Hypercritical
Hypercrítical. adj. [from hypercritick.] Critical beyond necessity or use.
We are far from imposing those nice and hypercritical punctilio's, which some astrologers oblige our gardeners to. Evelyn.
Such hypercritical readers will consider my business was to make a body of refined sayings, only taking care to produce them in the most natural manner. Swift.

Hypercritick
Hypercrítick. n.s. [hypercritique, Fr. ὕπερ and κρίτικος.] A critick exact or captious beyond use or reason.
Those hypercriticks in English poetry differ from the opinion of the Greek and Latin judges of antiquity, from the Italians and French, and from the general taste of all ages. Dryd.

Hypermeter
Hypérmeter. n.s. [ὑπερ and μέτρον.] Any thing greater than the standard requires.
When a man rises beyond six foot, he is an hypermeter, and may be admitted into the tall club. Addison's Guardian.

Hypersarcosis
Hypersarcósis. n.s. [ὑπερσάρκωσις, ὕπερ and σαρκὸς.] The growth of fungous or proud flesh.
Where the hypersarcosis was great, I sprinkled it with precipitate, whereby I more speedily freed the ulcer of its putrefaction. Wiseman's Surgery.

Hyphen
Hýphen. n.s. [ὐφὲν.] A note of conjunction: as, vir-tue, ever-living.

Hypnotick
Hypnótick. n.s. [ὕπνος.] Any medicine that induces sleep.

Hypochondres
Hypochóndres. n.s. [hypocondre, Fr. ὑποχόνδριον.] The two regions lying on each side the cartilago ensiformis, and those of the ribs, and the tip of the breast, which have in one the liver, and in the other the spleen. Quincy.
The blood moving too slowly through the celiack and mesenterick arteries, produce various complaints in the lower bowels and hypochondres; from whence such persons are called hypochondriack. Arbuthnot on Aliments.

Hypochondriacal
Hypochondríacal.Hypochondríack.

adj. [hypocondriaque, French, from hypochondres.]



 Melancholy; disordered in the imagination.
Socrates laid down his life in attestation of that most fundamental truth, the belief of one God; and yet he's not recorded either as fool or hypochondriack. Decay of Piety.
 Producing melancholy.
Cold sweats are many times mortal, and always suspected; as in great fears, and hypochondriacal passions, being a relaxation or forsaking of the spirits. Bacon's Nat. History.

Hypochondriack
Hypochondríacal.Hypochondríack.

adj. [hypocondriaque, French, from hypochondres.]



 Melancholy; disordered in the imagination.
Socrates laid down his life in attestation of that most fundamental truth, the belief of one God; and yet he's not recorded either as fool or hypochondriack. Decay of Piety.
 Producing melancholy.
Cold sweats are many times mortal, and always suspected; as in great fears, and hypochondriacal passions, being a relaxation or forsaking of the spirits. Bacon's Nat. History.

Hysterical
Hystérical.Hystérick.

adj. [hysterique, French; ὑστερικὸς.]



 Troubled with fits; disordered in the regions of the womb.
In hysterick women the rarity of symptoms doth oft strike such an astonishment into spectators, that they report them possessed with the devil. Harvey on Consumptions.
Many hysterical women are sensible of wind passing from the womb. Floyer on the Humours.
 Proceeding from disorders in the womb.
Parent of vapours, and of female wit,Who gave th' hysterick or poetick fit. Pope's Ra. of the Lock.
This terrible scene made too violent an impression upon a woman in her condition, and threw her into a strong hysterick fit. Arbuthn. and Pope's Mart. Scribl.

Hysterick
Hystérical.Hystérick.

adj. [hysterique, French; ὑστερικὸς.]



 Troubled with fits; disordered in the regions of the womb.
In hysterick women the rarity of symptoms doth oft strike such an astonishment into spectators, that they report them possessed with the devil. Harvey on Consumptions.
Many hysterical women are sensible of wind passing from the womb. Floyer on the Humours.
 Proceeding from disorders in the womb.
Parent of vapours, and of female wit,Who gave th' hysterick or poetick fit. Pope's Ra. of the Lock.
This terrible scene made too violent an impression upon a woman in her condition, and threw her into a strong hysterick fit. Arbuthn. and Pope's Mart. Scribl.

Hystericks
Hystéricks. n.s. [ὑστερικὸς.] Fits of women, supposed to proceed from disorders in the womb.
